Rhode Island statutes. Title 3 Alcoholic Beverages
Chapter 11 Penalties and Liabilities

3-11-1.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1933, ch. 2013, § 69; G.L. 1938, ch. 168, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

3-11-1

; P.L. 1985, ch. 430, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 1986, ch. 537, § 1. Section 2 of P.L. 1986, ch. 537 provides that the repeal of this section by that Act shall take effect upon passage (June 25, 1986) and apply only to causes of action arising on or after that date. For present provisions of law, see §

3-14-1

et seq.

3-11-2.
Habitually intemperate persons — Notice by family or employer — Liability of notified persons.

The husband, wife, parent, child, guardian, or employer of any person who has the habit of drinking intoxicating beverages to excess may give notice, in writing, signed by him or her, to any person requesting him or her not to sell or deliver intoxicating beverage to the person having that habit. If the person, so notified, at any time within twelve (12) months sells or delivers any intoxicating beverage to the person having that habit, or permits that person to loiter on his or her premises, the person giving the notice may in a civil action recover from the person notified any sum as may be assessed as damages; provided, the employer giving the notice shall be injured in his or her person, business or property. A married person may bring the action in his or her own name, and all damages recovered by him or her shall enure to his or her separate use. In case of the death of either party, the action and right of action shall survive to or against the executor or administrator.

History of Section.

P.L. 1933, ch. 2013, § 70; G.L. 1938, ch. 168, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

3-11-2

; P.L. 1998, ch. 441, § 9.

3-11-3.
Actions for beverages unlawfully sold.

No action of any kind shall be had or maintained in any court of this state for the value of any beverage drunk upon the premises of the seller or for the possession or value of any beverages held, purchased, or sold contrary to this title.

History of Section.

P.L. 1933, ch. 2013, § 76; G.L. 1938, ch. 169, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

3-11-3

.

3-11-4.
Unlawful possession of corks, seals, and labels.

The possession of crowns, corks, seals, wrappers, containers, or labels of, on or for beverages, whether those crowns, corks, seals, wrappers, containers, or labels are real or imitation, by a person not the proprietor or the authorized agent of the proprietor of the beverage represented by those crowns, corks, seals, or labels, or said to be contained in those wrappers or containers, is declared to be unlawful and every person in possession of those crowns, corks, seals, wrappers, containers, or labels shall be fined or imprisoned, or both, as provided in §

3-11-5

.

This section shall not apply to crowns, corks, seals, wrappers, or labels on or to containers of beverages which were marketed by the proprietor, if the person in possession of those crowns, corks, seals, wrappers, or labels does not intend to use them or to abet another in using them in connection with the sale of beverages. The provisions of §§

3-12-9

—

3-12-15

are made applicable so as to authorize forfeitures of crowns, corks, seals, wrappers, labels, and containers unlawfully possessed in the same manner as if those crowns, corks, seals, wrappers, labels, and containers were mentioned in those sections.

History of Section.

P.L. 1933, ch. 2013, § 36, as enacted by P.L. 1934, ch. 2088, § 9; G.L. 1938, ch. 170, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

3-11-4

; P.L. 1965, ch. 168, § 3.

3-11-5.
Penalties for violations.

Except as otherwise expressly provided, any person violating any of the provisions of this title, shall be subject to a fine not in excess of one thousand dollars ($1000).

History of Section.

P.L. 1933, ch. 2013, § 35; P.L. 1934, ch. 2088, § 9; P.L. 1936, ch. 2337, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 170, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

3-11-5

; P.L. 1999, ch. 146, § 1.